Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-736
Sickness and accident insurance; extended disability benefit; how construed.

Any policy of sickness and accident insurance may contain a provision for paying an extended disability benefit upon the insured's death from any cause, which benefit shall not be construed as life insurance.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 5(3), p. 462;

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 18, p. 658;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 149.